Yamls/Pron-setshom_gt-norm.yaml
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезнам 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧтӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьям]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезам
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммесим, cэтшӧммезсим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезам
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧлань, этшшӧммезланям]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧсянь, cэтшӧммезсяням]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧттям, cэтшӧммезӧттим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧдззам, cэтшӧммезӧдззим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезланям, cэтшӧммезӧланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезланьсим, cэтшӧммезӧланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезланям, cэтшӧммезӧланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсяням]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттям, cэтшӧммезланьӧттим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [cэтшӧммезӧланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззам, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззим]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: cэтшӧммезӧланьви 


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммет, cэтшӧммезыт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметӧ, cэтшӧммезтӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметлӧн, cэтшӧммезытлӧн]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметлісь, cэтшӧммезытлісь]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметлӧ, cэтшӧммезытлӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: cэтшӧммезнат 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметкӧт, cэтшӧммезыткӧт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметтӧг, cэтшӧммезыттӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметла, cэтшӧммезытла]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммется, cэтшӧммезытся]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: cэтшӧммезат
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммесит, cэтшӧммезсит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: cэтшӧммезат
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметлань, cэтшӧммезытлань, этшшӧммезланят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметсянь, cэтшӧммезытсянь, cэтшӧммезсянят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммезӧттят, cэтшӧммезӧттит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммезӧдззат, cэтшӧммезӧдззит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметви, cэтшӧммезытви]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммезланят, cэтшӧмметланьын, cэтшӧммезытланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммезланьсит, cэтшӧмметланись, cэтшӧммезытланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [cэтшӧммезланят, cэтшӧмметланьӧ, cэтшӧммезытланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметланьсянь, cэтшӧммезытланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсянят]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметланьӧт, cэтшӧммезытланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттят, cэтшӧммезланьӧттит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезытланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззат, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззит]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [cэтшӧмметланьви, cэтшӧммезытланьви] 


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммес, cэтшӧммезыс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесӧ, cэтшӧммезсӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммеслӧн, cэтшӧммезыслӧн]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммеслісь, cэтшӧммезыслісь]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммеслӧ, cэтшӧммезыслӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: cэтшӧммезнас 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммескӧт, cэтшӧммезыскӧт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [cэтшӧмместӧг, cэтшӧммезыстӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьяс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесла, cэтшӧммезысла]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесся, cэтшӧммезысся]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: cэтшӧммезас
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесис, cэтшӧммезсис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: cэтшӧммезас
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммеслань, cэтшӧммезыслань, этшшӧммезланяс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммессянь, cэтшӧммезыссянь, cэтшӧммезсяняс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммезӧттяс, cэтшӧммезӧттис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммезӧдззас, cэтшӧммезӧдззис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесви, cэтшӧммезысви]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммезланяс, cэтшӧммесланьын, cэтшӧммезысланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммезланьсис, cэтшӧммесланись, cэтшӧммезысланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммезланяс, cэтшӧммесланьӧ, cэтшӧммезысланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесланьсянь, cэтшӧммезысланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсяняс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесланьӧт, cэтшӧммезысланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттяс, cэтшӧммезланьӧттис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезысланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззас, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззис]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [cэтшӧммесланьви, cэтшӧммезысланьви]

 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезным
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымӧс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнаным 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымкӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымтӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьяным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезаным
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммесиным, cэтшӧммезсиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезаным
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымлань, этшшӧммезланяным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымсянь, cэтшӧммезсяняным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезӧттяным, cэтшӧммезӧттиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезӧдззаным, cэтшӧммезӧдззиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезланяным, cэтшӧммезнымланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезланьсиным, cэтшӧммезнымланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезланяным, cэтшӧммезнымланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсяняным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттяным, cэтшӧммезланьӧттиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [cэтшӧммезнымланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззаным, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззиным]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: cэтшӧммезнымланьви 


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезныт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытлӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытлісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытлӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнаныт 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезныткӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезныттӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьяныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезаныт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммесиныт, cэтшӧммезсиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезаныт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезнытлань, этшшӧммезланяныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезнытсянь, cэтшӧммезсяняныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезӧттяныт, cэтшӧммезӧттиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезӧдззаныт, cэтшӧммезӧдззиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезланяныт, cэтшӧммезнытланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезланьсиныт, cэтшӧммезнытланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезланяныт, cэтшӧммезнытланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезнытланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсяняныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезнытланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттяныт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [cэтшӧммезнытланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззаныт, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззиныт]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: cэтшӧммезнытланьви 


    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезныс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнысӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезныслӧн
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезныслісь
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезныслӧ
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнаныс 
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Com+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезныскӧт
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезныстӧг, cэтшӧммезтӧгьяныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнысла
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнысся
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезаныс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммесиныс, cэтшӧммезсиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезаныс
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезныслань, этшшӧммезланяныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезныссянь, cэтшӧммезсяняныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезӧттяныс, cэтшӧммезӧттиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезӧдззаныс, cэтшӧммезӧдззиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнысви
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезланяныс, cэтшӧммезнысланьын]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезланьсиныс, cэтшӧммезнысланись]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезланяныс, cэтшӧммезнысланьӧ]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезнысланьсянь, cэтшӧммезланьсяняныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезнысланьӧт, cэтшӧммезланьӧттяныс, cэтшӧммезланьӧттиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [cэтшӧммезнысланьӧдз, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззаныс, cэтшӧммезланьӧдззиныс]
    cэтшӧм+Det+Dem+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: cэтшӧммезнысланьви 
